West Virginia, session 2025, SB916.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 36. agritourism responsibility act. §19-36-7. Promotion of agritourism. (a) It is the intention of the Legislature to promote agritourism as a means of supporting agricultural production and to educate the public about the agricultural industry and its importance within the state.(b) A county commission, municipality, or public health department may not adopt or enact an ordinance, rule, license requirement, or other authorization that contravenes or is stricter than any state law, rule, or regulation relating to agricultural operations, as defined in §19-19-2 of this code. Any ordinance, rule, regulation, license requirement, or other authorization previously adopted by a county commission, municipality, or public health department that contravenes or is stricter than any state law, rule, or regulation regarding agricultural operations is revoked. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home